Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 2811.
Regulation of radiologic technology; Director; advisor appointees.

The Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.
(a) (1) The Director shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

The Secretary of State shall appoint six persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning radiologic technology, radiologic safety, and the optimal administration of this chapter.
(2) (A) The Secretary of State shall appoint six persons of suitable qualifications in accordance with this section to advise the Director in matters concerning radiologic technology, radiologic safety, and the optimal administration of this chapter.

The Secretary shall appoint the advisors for five-year staggered terms. Four of the initial appointments shall be for four-, three-, two-, and one-year terms.

The Director shall consult the appointed advisors prior to exercising interpretive discretion, adopting or amending rules, and determining any substantial regulatory question presented in the course of administering this chapter.

One advisor shall be a member of the public who has no financial interest in radiologic technology other than as a consumer or possible consumer of its services. The public member shall have no financial interest personally or through a spouse.

One advisor shall be a radiologist certified by the American Board of Radiology.

Three advisors shall be licensed under this chapter, one representing each of the three following primary modalities: radiography, nuclear medicine technology, and radiation therapy.

One advisor shall be a representative from the radiological health program of the Vermont Department of Health.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

1997, No. 40

, § 32;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. June 27, 2002;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2812.
Director; powers and duties.

The Director shall adopt rules necessary for the effective administration of this chapter, including:

a definition of the practice of radiologic technology, interpreting section 2801 of this chapter;

qualifications for obtaining licensure, interpreting sections 2821a and 2821b of this chapter;

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given to applicants and the public;

procedures for disciplinary and reinstatement cases;

[Repealed.]

procedures for mandatory reporting of unsafe radiologic conditions or practices;

procedures for continued competency evaluation;

procedures for radiation safety;

procedures for competency standards for license applications and renewals.

The Director shall:

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

investigate suspected unprofessional conduct;

periodically determine whether a sufficient supply of good quality radiologic technology services is available in Vermont at a competitive and reasonable price and take suitable action, within the scope of the Office’s powers, to solve or bring public and professional attention to any problem that it finds in this area; and

as a condition of renewal require that a licensee establish that he or she has completed a minimum of 24 hours of continuing education, the specific requirements of which may be specified by rule.

The Director may:

Refer cases of apparent improper radiologic technology practice to any occupational board with authority over the person concerned.

Investigate suspected cases of unauthorized practice of radiologic technology, and refer any such case the Office’s State prosecuting attorney, to the Attorney General, or a State’s Attorney for possible prosecution and injunctive relief.

Conduct hearings.

Administer oaths and issue subpoenas.

Issue orders relating to discovery in the same manner as a judge under the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, which may be enforced in the same manner as a subpoena.

Adopt rules relating to the procedures to be followed in handling complaints and conducting hearings under this chapter.

Receive assistance from the Attorney General or other State agencies, so long as the assistance is not contrary to any other State law.

Conduct a competency evaluation where radiographic services are performed by licensees and licensed practitioners required to demonstrate competency under section 2804 of this chapter to ensure that optimum radiologic technology practices are used to minimize patient and occupational radiation dose.
(8) (A) Conduct a competency evaluation where radiographic services are performed by licensees and licensed practitioners required to demonstrate competency under section 2804 of this chapter to ensure that optimum radiologic technology practices are used to minimize patient and occupational radiation dose.

The Director may contract with the Department of Health or others to perform evaluations under this subdivision (8).

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.) § 45;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

1999, No. 52

, §§ 19, 20;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2013, No. 27

, § 32;

2019, No. 30

, § 18.

§ 2813.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 18.

§ 2814.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 65;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 46;

1997, No. 59

, § 60, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 180;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 21, 2002;

2011, No. 66

, § 9, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2019, No. 70

, § 21.